Connecticut, session 2026, SB00281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a task force to
study available means of encouraging nursing homes in the state to
become federally contracted veterans nursing homes and increase the
availability of nursing home care to veterans eligible for and in need of
such care. The task force shall consider financial incentives, including,
but not limited to, assistance to supplement reimbursement for such
care and tax credits, and other manners of promoting such nursing
homes to veterans eligible for care that is covered by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs. As used in this section, "nursing home"
and "federally contracted veterans nursing home" have the same
meanings as provided in section 19a-533 of the general statutes.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
LCO No. 1550 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 281
(1) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(2) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate; and
(7) The Commissioner of Veterans Affairs, or the commissioner's
designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than August 1, 2026. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than
September 1, 2026.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to veterans'
and military affairs shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to veterans'
LCO No. 1550 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 281
and military affairs, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section